Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1960.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Business Income and Receipts Tax Exemption Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Business." As defined under section 301(c) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971.Section 3. Tax exemption.(a) Exemption.--A city of the first class shall permit an exemption to the city's business income and receipts tax for any business with $100,000 or less in gross annual receipts taxable 123456789101112131415161718 by the city.(b) Eligibility.--To be eligible for the exemption under subsection (a), a business must:(1) be registered and operating within the confines of the City of Philadelphia;(2) demonstrate compliance with all Federal, State and local tax obligations; and(3) provide documentation to substantiate revenue figures and eligibility for the exemption as outlined by guidelines adopted by the city of the first class.Section 4. Reporting requirements.A business that receives an exemption under section 3(a) must provide annual reports to the Department of Revenue of the city of the first class detailing the business's gross receipts and the utilization of the exemption.Section 5. Applicability.This act shall apply to tax years beginning after December 31, 2025.Section 6. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1960PN2476 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920